src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LUVTTE
+V+Inf:%>ъе # ;
+V+Ind: V_IND_CONTR_PAL ;

LEXICON KULLE
+V+Inf:%>э # ;
+V+Ind: V_IND_EVEN ;

LEXICON V_IMP
+Sg:  # ; !Ø-suffix, weak grade
+Pl:%>э  # ;


LEXICON V_IND_EVEN
+Prs: PRSSUF_EVEN ;
+Prt: PRTSUF_EVEN ;

LEXICON PRSSUF_EVEN
+Sg1:%^WG%>а              # ;   ! шоабш>а
+Sg2:%^WG%>ак              # ;   ! шоабш>акь
+Sg2:%^WG%>ах              # ;   ! шоабш>акь
+Sg3:              # ;   !Ø-suffix Umlautvariant -оа- шoabаш>т
+Pl1:%>эпь              # ;   ! шоабш>эпь
+Pl2:%>бэдтӭ              # ;   ! шоабш>эбпе
+Pl3:%>эв              # ;   ! шоабш>эв

LEXICON PRTSUF_EVEN
+Sg1:%>е       # ; ! palatalized		шоабш>э
+Sg2:%>екь       # ; ! palatalized		шоабш>экь
+Sg2:%>ехь       # ; ! palatalized		шоабш>экь
+Sg3:%^WG%>э       # ; ! weak grade		шoab>эшт
+Pl1:%^WG%>эмь       # ; ! weak grade		шоабш>эмь
+Pl2:%^WG%>этҍ       # ; ! weak grade	шоабш>этҍ
+Pl3:%>енҍ       # ; ! palatalized	шоабш>энҍ


LEXICON V_POT 
+Sg1:%>   # ;
+Sg2:%>   # ;
+Sg3:%>   # ;
+Pl1:%>   # ;
+Pl2:%>   # ;
+Pl3:%>   # ;



LEXICON V_IND_CONTR_PAL
+Prs: PRSSUF_CONTR_PAL ;
+Prt: PRTSUF_CONTR_PAL ;

LEXICON PRSSUF_CONTR_PAL
+Sg1:%>ъя    # ;   
+Sg2:%>ъях   # ;  
+Sg2:%>ъяк   # ;  
+Sg3:%>ай    # ;   
+Pl1:%>ъeпь  # ; 
+Pl2:%>ъепе  # ; 
+Pl3:%>ъэв   # ;  

LEXICON PRTSUF_CONTR_PAL
+Sg1:%>ъе    # ; 
+Sg2:%>ъекь  # ; 
+Sg2:%>ъехь  # ; 
+Sg3:%>ӭй    # ;  
+Pl1:%>ъемь  # ; 
+Pl2:%>ъетҍ  # ; 
+Pl3:%>ъенҍ  # ; 




! conneg.prs	шоабэшт
! conneg.pst	шоабш>а

! imp			шоабш-э

! verbessive	шоабш-эмэнҍ

!  verbabessive		шоабш-эханна
